Utah statutes.
78B-6-132.   Children in the custody of the Division of Child and Family
Services -- Consideration of child's relationship with foster parents who
petition for adoption.
In assessing the best interest of a child in the custody of the Division of
Child and Family Services whose foster parents have petitioned for adoption,
the court shall give special consideration to the relationship of the child
with his foster parents, if the child has been in that home for a period of
six months or longer.
